District of Columbia statutes.
29-1110

Effect of judgment or order.

A judgment or order against an unincorporated nonprofit association shall not by itself [be] a judgment or order against a member or manager.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 10 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).